Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 9.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201083-964
Sentence
of death; how enforced.

A sentence of death shall be enforced
by the intravenous injection of a substance or substances in a quantity sufficient
to cause death. The lethal substance or substances shall be administered in
compliance with an execution protocol created and maintained by the Department
of Correctional Services.

Laws 1973, LB 268, § 17;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 29-2532;

Laws 2009, LB36, § 9.

Under former law, Nebraska's statutes specifying electrocution as the mode of inflicting the death penalty are separate, and severable, from the procedures by which the trial court sentences the defendant. State v. Mata, 275 Neb. 1, 745 N.W.2d 229 (2008).

Under former law, that a method of execution is cruel and unusual punishment bears solely on the legality of the execution of the sentence and not on the validity of the sentence itself. State v. Mata, 275 Neb. 1, 745 N.W.2d 229 (2008).